Utah statutes.
31A-8-105.5.   Primary care physicians.

With regard to participating providers who are physicians who are members of the American College of Obstetrics and Gynecology, organizations operating under this chapter shall:

(1)  permit a female enrollee to receive at least one outpatient examination per year from the enrollee's choice of one of those participating providers.  An organization may not require the enrollee to receive a preapproval, preauthorization, or referral from the enrollee's primary care physician before receiving this examination; and

(2)  clearly state in the organization's health benefit plan literature that enrollees may seek the care described in Subsection (1) without preapproval, preauthorization, or referral from the patient's primary care physician.

